Hawaii, session 2026, HB886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that unlicensed drivers on Hawaii's roads pose a significant public safety risk to themselves and others.  While existing law allows police officers to cite unlicensed drivers, there is currently no requirement to prevent these cited drivers from immediately continuing to operate their vehicles unlawfully after receiving citations.  The legislature believes that establishing clear protocols for law enforcement when encountering unlicensed drivers will enhance public safety by ensuring these drivers do not continue to operate vehicles without valid licenses. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is: (1)  Provide that if a law enforcement officer lawfully stops a motor vehicle and the operator is cited for driving without a valid license, the officer shall not permit the operator to resume the use of the motor vehicle; (2)  Require the motor vehicle to be moved by a licensed driver or towed at the owner's expense; and (3)  Provide that the cited operator is responsible for arranging the operator's transportation away from the scene of the stop. SECTION 2.  Chapter 286, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part VI to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§286- Unauthorized operators; use of motor vehicle prohibited.  (a)  If a law enforcement officer lawfully stops a motor vehicle and cites the person operating the motor vehicle for allegedly violating section 286-102, 286-122, 286‑130, 286‑131, 286-132, 286-133, or 286-134, the officer shall not permit the operator to resume the use of the motor vehicle. (b) The motor vehicle may be removed from the scene of the stop by: (1)  The registered owner of the motor vehicle, if the registered owner possesses a valid driver's license; or (2)  Any other individual who possesses a valid driver's license, if the individual has the explicit permission of the registered owner of the motor vehicle; provided that the individual taking possession of the motor vehicle is able to legally park or store the motor vehicle. (c)  If an individual described in subsection (b) cannot remove the motor vehicle within a reasonable time, the law enforcement officer shall arrange for the motor vehicle to be towed, at the expense of the motor vehicle's registered owner, to: (1)  The address of the motor vehicle's registered owner; or (2)  Any location designated by the county in which the stop occurred. (d) The cited operator shall be responsible for arranging the cited operator's transportation from the scene of the stop, which may include the use of public transportation, rideshare or taxi services, or riding as a passenger in a motor vehicle operated by a person possessing a valid driver's license.  Any transportation expenses incurred shall be the responsibility of the cited operator. The cited operator shall inform the law enforcement officer of the cited operator's transportation arrangements." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________